Utah statutes.
63G-6a-2307.   Contract awarded in relation to criminal conduct void.

If a person who is awarded a contract intentionally violates a provision of Section 63G-6a-2304.5 in relation to the contract, the contract is void and unenforceable.



Amended by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

